local/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
    <pardef n="dubb/el__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elt</l>
          <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="simp/el__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elt</l>
          <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>laste</l>
          <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>last</l>
          <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nak/en__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nare</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>naste</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nast</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="klentrog/en__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tapp/er__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rare</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ert</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>raste</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rast</l>
          <r>er<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/gammal__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>äldre</l>
          <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gammalt</l>
          <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gamla</l>
          <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gammal</l>
          <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>äldsta</l>
          <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>äldst</l>
          <r>gammal<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/god__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>godare</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gott</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>goda</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>goda</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>god</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>godast</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bättre</l>
          <r>god<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/liten__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>små</l>
          <r>liten<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>litet</l>
          <r>liten<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lilla</l>
          <r>liten<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>smått</l>
          <r>liten<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liten</l>
          <r>liten<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>minst</l>
          <r>liten<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mindre</l>
          <r>liten<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="indef"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="dubbel"><i>dubb</i><par n="dubb/el__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fullgammal"><i>full</i><par n="/gammal__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gladgod"><i>gla</i><par n="/god__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="klentrogen"><i>klentrog</i><par n="klentrog/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ledsen"><i>leds</i><par n="klentrog/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="liknandeliten"><i>liknande</i><par n="/liten__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mogen"><i>mog</i><par n="klentrog/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="naken"><i>nak</i><par n="nak/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nyfiken"><i>nyfik</i><par n="nak/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="oregelbunden"><i>oregelbund</i><par n="nak/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="simpel"><i>simp</i><par n="simp/el__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sorgsen"><i>sorgs</i><par n="klentrog/en__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tapper"><i>tapp</i><par n="tapp/er__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vacker"><i>vack</i><par n="tapp/er__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="vuxen"><i>vux</i><par n="klentrog/en__adj"/></e>
